Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 6 ENFORCEMENT AND CIVIL LIABILITY
11-51-606. Conduct of proceedings - cease-and-desist orders - consent orders - summary orders - issued by securities commissioner - rules.

Any administrative proceeding under this article shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of sections 24-4-104 and 24-4-105, C.R.S.; except that section 24-4-104 (3), C.R.S., shall not apply to any proceeding conducted pursuant to this article. Except as specified in paragraph (d) of subsection (1.5) or paragraph (e) of subsection (3) of this section, the securities commissioner shall refer the conduct of all hearings to an administrative law judge appointed pursuant to part 10 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S., or a panel of the securities board in the discretion of the securities commissioner, based upon the complexity of the matter, number of parties to the matter, and legal issues presented in the matter. Every hearing in an administrative proceeding shall be public unless the securities commissioner, in the securities commissioner's discretion, grants a request joined in by all the respondents that the hearing be conducted privately.

(1.5) (a) Whenever it appears to the securities commissioner, based upon sufficient evidence as presented in a petition by an officer or employee of the division of securities, that a person has committed or may commit any of the acts or practices listed in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1.5), then, in addition to any specific powers granted under this article, the securities commissioner, in his or her discretion, may issue to such person an order to show cause why the securities commissioner should not enter a final order directing such person to cease and desist from the unlawful act or practice, or impose such other sanctions as provided in subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (d) of this subsection (1.5). The securities commissioner shall, within two calendar days, notify the chairperson of the securities board or an administrative law judge that an order to show cause has been issued, and the chairperson or administrative law judge shall set a date for hearing on such order before the securities board or administrative law judge as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1.5).

The securities commissioner may take action pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) with regard to any of the following acts or practices:

The sale of a security is subject to registration under this article and the security is being offered or has been offered or sold in violation of section 11-51-301, or any rule or order under said section;

Any person has engaged or is about to engage in the offer or sale of a security or any other act or practice in violation of section 11-51-401 or any rule or order under said section;

Any person has engaged or is about to engage in the offer or sale of a security or any other act or practice in violation of section 11-51-501 or any rule or order under said section;

Any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice in violation of any provision of article 53 of this title; or

Any person has violated or is about to violate any order previously entered by the securities commissioner.

Any person against whom an order to show cause has been entered pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) shall be promptly notified by the securities division of the entry of the order, along with a copy of the order, the factual and legal basis for the order, and the date set by the chairperson of the securities board or an administrative law judge for hearing on such order. Such notice may be served by United States mail, postage prepaid, to the last-known address of such person, by personal service, by facsimile transmission, or as may be practicable upon any person against whom such order is entered. Mailing or facsimile transmission of an order or other documents under this subsection (1.5), or personal service of such orders or documents, shall constitute notice thereof to the person.

The hearing on an order to show cause shall be commenced no sooner than ten nor later than twenty-one calendar days following the date of transmission or service of the notification by the securities division as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1.5). The hearing may be continued by agreement of all of the parties based upon the complexity of the matter, number of parties to the matter, and legal issues presented in the matter, but in no event shall the hearing commence later than thirty-five calendar days following the date of transmission or service of the notification.

If a person against whom an order to show cause entered pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) does not appear at the hearing, the securities division may present evidence that notification was properly sent or served upon such person pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (1.5) and such other evidence related to the matter as the securities board or administrative law judge deems appropriate. In the case where such person does not appear, the securities commissioner may not issue an order unless there is a finding by the securities board or administrative law judge that there is a reasonable basis to believe such notification was actually received or served, or, after reasonable search by the securities division, the person against whom the order was entered cannot be located. The securities commissioner shall enter such order within ten days after his or her determination related to reasonable attempts of notification of the respondent, and the order shall become final as to that person by operation of law.

At any hearing pursuant to this paragraph (d), the securities board or administrative law judge shall take evidence and hear arguments from the securities division and the person against whom the order to show cause has been entered, pursuant to such rules and procedures as may be adopted by the securities commissioner. Based on the evidence entered and arguments heard at the hearing, the securities board or administrative law judge shall enter findings of fact, conclusions of law, and an initial decision recommending to the securities commissioner that a final order be entered affirming, denying, vacating, or otherwise modifying the order to show cause. The initial decision shall be issued within ten days after the conclusion of the hearing provided pursuant to this paragraph (d) and shall be promptly delivered to the securities commissioner.

If the securities commissioner reasonably finds that the person against whom the order to show cause was entered has engaged, or is about to engage, in acts or practices constituting violations as set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1.5) and makes the findings required by section 11-51-704 (2), he or she may issue a final cease-and-desist order imposing one or more of the following sanctions:

Directing such person to cease and desist from further unlawful acts or practices;

Censuring the person, if the person is a licensed broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative; or

Requiring such person to undertake or comply with conditions or limitations placed upon the activities, functions, or operations of such person, within such reasonable time period as may be imposed by the securities commissioner.

The securities commissioner shall provide notice of the final order within ten calendar days after receiving the initial decision, in the manner set forth in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1.5), to each person against whom such order has been entered. The final order entered pursuant to subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (d) shall be effective when issued, and shall be a final order for purposes of judicial review pursuant to section 11-51-607.

Whenever it appears to the securities commissioner, based upon sufficient evidence presented to the securities commissioner in a stipulation between an officer or employee of the division of securities and any person, that such person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this article, any rule promulgated pursuant to this article, or any order issued under this article, or any act or practice constituting grounds for administrative sanction under this article, the securities commissioner may issue a consent order against such person.

In any consent order issued pursuant to this subsection (2), the securities commissioner may:

Prohibit the respondent from any further violation of any provision, rule, or order under this article that is alleged in the stipulation to have been violated or from engaging in the conduct alleged in the stipulation as grounds for sanction under this article; and

Impose conditions, limitations, or sanctions as stipulated.

If it appears to the securities commissioner, based upon sufficient evidence as presented in a petition by an officer or employee of the division of securities, that, in the case of a registration statement subject to the escrow provisions in section 11-51-302 (5) or (6), there has been a violation of such escrow provisions, or, in the case of any registration statement under section 11-51-304, any of the grounds specified in section 11-51-306 (1) exist, the securities commissioner may enter a summary stop order postponing or suspending the effectiveness of the registration statement.

If it appears to the securities commissioner, based upon sufficient evidence as presented in a petition by an officer or employee of the division of securities, that sufficient grounds exist under section 11-51-310 (1), the securities commissioner may enter a summary order under section 11-51-310 (1)(b) suspending the exemption from securities registration under section 11-51-307 (1)(g) as to a specified security or issuer pending final determination of a proceeding under that section.

No summary order may be entered pursuant to this subsection (3) unless the securities commissioner determines, in addition to the findings required under section 11-51-704 (2), that immediate issuance of such summary order is imperatively necessary for the protection of investors. An order issued pursuant to this subsection (3) is effective when entered and shall be accompanied by a brief statement of findings of fact and conclusions of law.

Upon entering a summary order, the securities commissioner shall promptly notify each person against whom it has been entered of its entry and the basis therefor by providing to each such person at such person's last known mailing address a copy of the order and the accompanying findings of fact and conclusions of law.

Any person against whom a summary stop order or summary order suspending exemption has been entered may make a written request to the securities commissioner that the matter be set for a hearing if such request is made within twenty-one calendar days after the date of entry of the order. Upon receipt of such request, the securities commissioner shall notify the chairperson of the securities board, and the chairperson shall set a date for a hearing within twenty-one days to determine whether to continue the summary order.

Any such hearing before the securities board shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of section 24-4-105, C.R.S. Following the hearing, the securities board shall issue its initial decision, accompanied by findings of fact and conclusions of law. The securities commissioner shall then enter a decision that shall be a final order for purposes of judicial review pursuant to section 11-51-607.

If the securities commissioner does not receive a request for a hearing pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (e), the order shall become final twenty-one calendar days after the entry of such order.

If it appears to the securities commissioner, based upon sufficient evidence as presented in a petition by an officer or employee of the division of securities, that any of the grounds specified in section 11-51-410 (1) exist as to any licensed person or, in the case of a licensed broker-dealer, a partner, officer, director, person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, or a person directly or indirectly controlling a broker-dealer, the securities commissioner may issue to such person an order to show cause why the securities commissioner should not summarily suspend the license of that person or limit or impose conditions on the securities activities of that person pending final determination of a proceeding under sections 24-4-104 and 24-4-105, C.R.S. The securities commissioner shall promptly notify the chairperson of the securities board that an order to show cause has been issued, and the chairperson shall set a date for hearing on such order before the securities board.

Any person against whom an order to show cause has been entered shall be promptly notified by the securities division of the entry of such order and the basis therefor. Such notice shall include a copy of the order, and shall include the date set by the chairperson of the securities board for hearing on such order. In the case of a broker-dealer, the notification shall be sent both to the broker-dealer's last known mailing address and, if different, the most current mailing address the broker-dealer has on file with the securities commissioner as required in section 11-51-407 (3). In the case of a sales representative, notification shall be sent to the sales representative's last known mailing address, the most current mailing address the sales representative has on file with the securities commissioner as required in section 11-51-407 (3), and the last known mailing address of the broker-dealer or issuer for which the sales representative is licensed to act.

The hearing on the order to show cause shall be commenced no sooner than seven, nor later than twenty, calendar days following the date of transmission of notification of the respondent by the division of securities as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4).

The securities board shall take evidence and hear arguments from the securities division and the respondent. If the respondent does not appear, the securities division may provide evidence that notification was promptly sent by the securities division to the respondent pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (4). In the case where the respondent does not appear, the securities commissioner may not issue an order unless there is a finding by the securities board that there is reasonable basis to believe the respondent either received actual notice, or, after reasonable search by the securities division, cannot be located.

Based on the evidence entered and arguments heard at the hearing, the securities board shall enter findings of fact, conclusions of law, and its initial decision recommending to the securities commissioner that an order be entered either denying the petition of the securities division for summary order or suspending the license of that person or otherwise limiting or imposing conditions on the securities activities of that person pending final determination of a proceeding under sections 24-4-104 and 24-4-105, C.R.S. Exceptions to the initial decision of the securities board must be filed with the securities commissioner within ten calendar days of the date of entry of such order. The securities commissioner shall then issue an order, which shall be a final order for purposes of judicial review pursuant to section 11-51-607.

Any order entered under paragraph (c)(III) of this subsection (4) suspending a license or otherwise limiting or imposing conditions on the securities activities of the licensed person shall remain in effect during the pendency of a proceeding under sections 24-4-104 and 24-4-105, C.R.S., unless vacated or modified on judicial review pursuant to section 11-51-607 or by subsequent order of the securities commissioner after notice and opportunity for hearing.

No order under subsection (3)(b), (3)(c), or (4)(a) of this section may be entered by the securities commissioner unless a proceeding under sections 24-4-104 and 24-4-105, C.R.S., either has been commenced, or is commenced promptly following or contemporaneously with the entry of such an order.

The securities commissioner may promulgate a rule that defines what constitutes prompt filing and notification pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 734, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1841, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 800, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1), (1.5)(a), (1.5)(c), and (1.5)(d) amended and (6) added, pp. 517, 519, §§ 5, 6, effective July 1.

11-51-607. Judicial review of orders.

Any person aggrieved by a final order of the securities commissioner may obtain a review of the order in the court of appeals pursuant to the provisions of section 24-4-106 (11), C.R.S.

The commencement of proceedings under subsection (1) of this section does not, unless specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the securities commissioner's order.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 734, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1844, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-120 as it existed prior to 1990.